Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 8. Wyoming Professional Teaching Standards Board

§ 21-2-801.
Creation of board; appointment and composition; terms; vacancies; compensation.

The Wyoming professional teaching standards board is created to consist of thirteen (13) members appointed by the state superintendent and the governor as follows:

Six (6) certified public school employee members, two (2) of which shall be classroom teachers in grades kindergarten through six (6), three (3) of which shall be classroom teachers in grades seven (7) through twelve (12) and one (1) of which shall be a certified professional employee not assigned to classroom teaching but providing auxiliary professional services such as librarian, guidance counselor or educational diagnostician;

One (1) member to be a faculty member employed in an approved teacher preparation program in Wyoming offering approved preparation programs in the district;

One (1) member to be a dean of a post-secondary education preparation program appointed from an approved teacher preparation program within Wyoming post-secondary education institutions;

One (1) member to be a community college faculty member appointed from a Wyoming community college;

Three (3) members currently employed in public school administration as follows:

One (1) elementary principal;

One (1) secondary school principal;

One (1) central office administrator.

One (1) member who is a current member of a Wyoming school district board of trustees.

Board members shall be appointed to a term of four (4) years. No person shall be appointed for more than two (2) four (4) year terms. Vacancies shall be filled by the state superintendent and the governor on a rotating basis from the appropriate group pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Any board member may be removed as provided under W.S.

9-1-202

.

The members shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii) while attending board meetings. The board shall meet not less than once every three (3) months.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 217, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2013 amendment,

added “and the governor” in (a); and added “and the governor on a rotating basis” in (b).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the first sentence of (c), substituted “receive” for “be paid,” substituted “mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “travel expenses,” and deleted “at the same rate allowed by law for state employees.”

Application. —

In a certificated guidance counselor's wrongful termination suit, summary judgment in favor of the school district was proper as the counselor was not a teacher within the meaning of the Wyoming Teacher Employment Law, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

21-1-101

to

21-1-103

, and was therefore not entitled to its protections.
Luhm v. Bd. of Trs., 2009 WY 63, 206 P.3d 1290,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2009).

§ 21-2-802.
Powers and duties; teacher certification; suspension and revocation; certification fees; disposition of collected fees; required data submissions to department of education.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations:

For the certification of school administrators, teachers and other personnel to require either examination in specified subjects or the completion of courses in approved institutions, or both. However, nothing in this article shall be construed as permitting the board to impose any additional requirements beyond licensure in his own profession on any person licensed pursuant to title 33 in order for that person to practice his own profession in the schools as an employee of or contractor for a school district. Board rules and regulations shall require the following minimum qualifications and any additional qualifications for additional training in a broad general education as the board may designate:

For teachers, a degree from an accredited college or university;

For administrators, qualification as a teacher pursuant to subparagraph (a)(i)(A) of this section in addition to appropriate experience as a teacher and additional training in educational administration.

In addition to paragraph (a)(i) of this section, the board shall by rule and regulation provide for:

Certification of teachers of the Arapaho, Shoshone, or both, languages and in its discretion, the board may make other exceptions as to both teachers and administrators it determines necessary and proper in special circumstances;

Temporary employment as instructors of persons with extensive training or experience in a particular discipline if a certified teacher is not available. Those instructors shall be monitored and supervised by certified personnel;

School district establishment of courses taught primarily by electronic transmission such as broadcast through satellites which do not require the presence of a teacher certified in the subject matter being taught by this alternative method.

Providing that business instructors may instruct classes on economic systems and institutions.

The board may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states for the purposes of granting certification pursuant to this section.

The board may revoke, suspend, deny or refuse to renew certification for incompetency, conviction of a felony committed after July 1, 1996, immorality and other reprehensible conduct or gross neglect of duty or knowing misrepresentation of information on an application or resume, upon its own motion or upon the petition of any local board of trustees. Except as provided in subsection (k) of this section, no certificate shall be revoked or suspended without a hearing conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, unless the person holding the certification waives the right to a hearing.

The board may establish reasonable fees for application and issuance of certification under this section and may require the payment of fees as a condition for issuing any certificate. The fees may include the costs associated with the criminal history background check required by paragraph (e)(ii) of this section. Fees collected by the board pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited with the state treasurer. Upon receipt, the state treasurer shall credit the revenues to a separate account. Expenditures from the account shall be for expenses incurred by the board in administering this article.

No certification shall be issued under this section until a criminal history background check has been filed with and received by the board, the applicant provides a release of information and the applicant consents to the release of any criminal history information to the board and if applicable, to the employing school district. Upon receipt of a background report pursuant to this subsection indicating that the applicant has a conviction equal to a felony under Wyoming law or any conviction for an act which would constitute a violation under chapter 2 or chapter 4 of title 6 of the Wyoming statutes, the board shall immediately provide a copy of the report to the employing local school board if the information involves a certified individual employed by that local board and if the local board has requested a copy of the report. For all persons seeking initial certification under this section on or after July 1, 1996:

The applicant shall be required to verify under oath whether he has been convicted of a felony. The board may deny certification of any applicant who has been convicted of a felony that relates to the practice of teaching or to the ability to practice as a teacher and may annul a certificate for misrepresentation by an applicant of his criminal history. Any felony related to a sexual offense shall be considered to relate to the practice of teaching. Action by the board to annul a certificate shall be taken following a hearing conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, unless the person holding the certification waives the right to a hearing;

The applicant shall provide to the board fingerprints and other information necessary for a criminal history record background check as provided in W.S. 7-19-201(a).

Any local school board dismissing or accepting the resignation of a person holding certification under this section shall notify the professional standards teaching board of the dismissal or resignation, if the dismissal or acceptance of the resignation was based in whole or in part upon the person’s conviction of a felony.

For purposes of this section:

“Convicted” or “conviction” means an unvacated determination of guilt by any court having legal jurisdiction of the offense and from which no appeal is pending. Pleas of guilty and nolo contendere shall be deemed convictions for the purposes of this section. Dispositions pursuant to W.S.

7-13-301

or

35-7-1037

shall not be convictions for purposes of this section;

“Felony” means a criminal offense for which the penalty authorized by law includes imprisonment in a state penal institution for more than one (1) year. “Felony” includes an offense committed in another jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would constitute a felony as defined in this paragraph.

The board shall establish qualifications of persons teaching driver education in a public school in this state in accordance with W.S. 21-7-303(c).

Nothing in this section authorizes the board to establish qualifications of persons exempt from certification requirements pursuant to W.S. 21-7-303(b).

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

In accordance with criteria and guidelines established by the state superintendent of public instruction, the board shall submit data elements collected from school administrators, teachers and other school district personnel certified under this article to the department of education for housing in the department’s data base repository.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 217, § 1; 1995, ch. 72, § 1; 1996, ch. 94, § 2; 1997, ch. 66, § 1; ch. 128, § 2; ch. 194, § 1; 1999, ch. 188, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2011, ch. 185, § 1; 2012, ch. 71, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (d), in the fourth sentence substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the special revenue fund.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (m).

The 2012 amendment,

in (c), deleted “or” preceding “suspend,” and inserted “deny or refuse to renew” and “or knowing misrepresentation of information on an application or resume”; and in the introductory language of (e), added the first two sentences.

Laws 2012, ch. 71 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2012.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director of the department of education” for “state superintendent of public instruction” in (m).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in (m), substituted “state superintendent of public instruction” for “director of the department of.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (e)(i), in the second sentence, inserted “that relates to the practice of teaching or to the ability to practice as a teacher,” and added the present third sentence.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “(k)” for “(h)” following “subsection” in (c).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “Arapaho, Shoshone, or both, languages” for “Arapahoe and Shoshoni language” in (a)(ii)(A).

Editor's notes. —

There are no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).